District of Columbia statutes.
25-335

Denial — Public health and safety restrictions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the Board shall deny a license if the evidence reasonably shows that:

(1)

The establishment for which the license is sought is in violation of one or more of the Construction Codes for the District contained in Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, or any other law or rule of the District intended to protect public safety; or

(2)

The applicant has knowingly permitted, at the place for which the license is sought, the illegal sale, or negotiations for sale, or the use, of any controlled substance in violation of the CSA, or the possession or sale, or negotiations for sale, of drug paraphernalia in violation of the CSA, or Chapter 11 of Title 48. Successive sales, or negotiations for sale, over a continuous period of time constituting a recognizable pattern of activity shall be deemed evidence of knowing permission.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-335.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.